Utah statutes.
62A-4a-904.   Adoption assistance.
(1)  Pursuant to federal requirements of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq., Social
Security Act, the Division of Child and Family Services:
(a)  shall provide for:
(i)  payment of nonrecurring adoption expenses for an eligible child who has a
special need; and
(ii)  state medical assistance when required by federal law; and
(b)  may provide for monthly subsidies for an eligible child who has a special
need.
(2)  Payment of nonrecurring adoption expenses may not exceed $2,000 and shall
be limited to costs incurred prior to finalization of an adoption.
(3)  The level of monthly subsidy under Subsection (1)(b) shall be based on:
(a)  the child's present and long-term treatment and care needs; and
(b)  the family's ability to meet the needs of the child.
(4) (a)  The level of monthly subsidy may increase or decrease when the
child's level of need or the family's ability to meet the child's need
changes.
(b)  Either the family or the division may initiate changes to the monthly
subsidy.
(5)  Financial support provided under Subsection (1)(b) may not exceed the
maximum foster care payment or residential room and board payment that would
be paid at the time the subsidy amount is initiated or revised.
